District of Columbia statutes.
34-2101

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

(1)

The term “sanitary sewage” means:

(A)

Domestic sewage with storm and surface water limited;

(B)

Sewage discharging from sanitary conveniences;

(C)

Commercial or industrial wastes; and

(D)

Water supply after it has been used.

(2)

The term “stormwater sewage” means liquid flowing in sewers resulting directly from precipitation.

(3)

The term “combined sewage” means sewage containing both sanitary sewage and stormwater sewage.

(4)

The term “sewer” means a pipe or conduit carrying sewage.

(5)

The term “sanitary sewer” means a sewer which carries sanitary sewage.

(6)

The term “stormwater sewer” means a sewer which carries stormwater sewage.

(7)

The term “combined sewer” means a sewer which carries both sanitary sewage and stormwater sewage.

(8)

The term “sanitary sewage works” means a system of sanitary and combined sewers, appurtenances, pumping stations, and treatment works for conveying, treating, and disposing of sanitary sewage.

(9)

The term “stormwater sewer system” means a system of sewers, appurtenances, and pumping stations for conveying and disposing of stormwater sewage.

(10)

The term “combined sewer system” means a system of sewers and appurtenances conveying both sanitary sewage and stormwater sewage.

History

May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 104, ch. 218, title II, § 201

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1161.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1601.
1973 Ed., § 43-1601.